New Jersey, session 222, S3921.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  N.J.S.2C:45-2 is amended to read as follows: 2C:45-2.  Period of Suspension or Probation; Modification of Conditions; Discharge of Defendant  a.  When the court has suspended imposition of sentence or has sentenced a defendant to be placed on probation, the period of the suspension shall be fixed by the court at not to exceed the maximum term which could have been imposed or more than 5 years whichever is lesser. The period of probation shall be fixed by the court at not less than 1 year nor more than 5 years. The court, on application of a probation officer or of the defendant, or on its own motion, may discharge the defendant at any time.  Upon discharge from the period of suspension or probation, the probation division shall notify the victim or nearest relative of a homicide victim of the defendants discharge. b.    During the period of the suspension or probation, the court, on application of a probation officer or of the defendant, or on its own motion, may (1) modify the requirements imposed on the defendants; or (2) add further requirements authorized by N.J.S.2C:45-1.  The probation division shall notify the victim or nearest relative of a homicide victim regarding any modification or suspension which has the effect of shortening the defendants period of suspension or modification.  The court shall eliminate any requirement that imposes an unreasonable burden on the defendant. c.     Upon the termination of the period of suspension or probation or the earlier discharge of the defendant, the defendant shall be relieved of any obligations imposed by the order of the court and shall have satisfied his sentence for the offense unless the defendant has failed: (1)   to fulfill conditions imposed pursuant to paragraph b. (11) of N.J.S.2C:45-1, in which event the court may order that the probationary period be extended for an additional period not to exceed that authorized by subsection a. of this section; or (2)   to fulfill the conditions imposed pursuant to subsection c. of N.J.S.2C:45-1, in which event the court shall order that the probationary period be extended for an additional period not to exceed that authorized by subsection a. of this section. The extension may be entered by the court without the defendant's personal appearance if the defendant agrees to the extension. Notwithstanding any provision in this section to the contrary, any order of the court prohibiting contact with a victim imposed on a defendant convicted of a sex offense shall continue in effect following the termination of probation supervision until further order of the court. (cf: P.L.2007, c.133, s.5) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.